Massachusetts, session 194th, HD4576.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1: Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Section 1 of
Chapter 32 in the 2020 Official Edition is hereby amended by inserting in line 633 after the
phrase following "regular compensation"; Regular compensation shall include all overtime paid
to any employee as defined by this chapter, who was required to, or volunteered to, work outside
their home during the COVID 19 pandemic state of emergency that commenced on March 10,
2020 until the conclusion of the COVID 19 state of emergency.
The state human resources administrator shall compile a list of all employees eligible for
overtime under this chapter and transmit it to the state retirement board.
of 1